New York, session 2025-2026, S7428.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 2857 of the education law, as 2 amended by section 7 of part D-2 of chapter 57 of the laws of 2007, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 1. The board of regents shall distribute information announcing the 5 availability of the charter school process described in this article to 6 each local school district and public postsecondary educational institu- 7 tion. At each significant stage of the chartering process, the charter 8 entity and the board of regents shall provide appropriate notification 9 to the school district in which the charter school is located and to 10 public and nonpublic schools in the same geographic area as the proposed 11 charter school. Such notification shall be provided by each charter 12 entity within thirty days of its receipt of an application for formation 13 of a new charter school or for renewal of an existing charter school, 14 and at least forty-five days prior to initial approval of the charter 15 application by the charter entity. Prior to the issuance, revision, or 16 renewal of a charter, the school district in which the charter school is 17 located shall hold a public hearing to solicit comments from the commu- 18 nity in connection with the foregoing. Such hearing shall be held within 19 the community potentially impacted by the proposed charter school. When 20 a revision involves the relocation of a charter school to a different 21 school district, or, in a city with a population of one million or more, 22 to a different community education council district, the proposed new 23 school district or community education council district shall also hold 24 such hearing. In addition, such school districts shall be given an 25 opportunity to comment on the proposed charter to the charter entity and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07743-01-5 S. 7428 2 1 such charter entity shall consider any comments raised and submit any 2 such comments to the board of regents with the application for issuance, 3 revision, or renewal of a charter. 4 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 5 have become a law.